Louisiana, session 2026, HB503.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:297.1(A)(1), (B), and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 32:297.1(A)(5) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§297.1. Alternative pathways for golf carts, utility terrain vehicles, and low-speed
vehicles; Golden Meadow
A. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Golf cart" means an electric a four-wheeled vehicle originally intended
for use off-road on golf courses and other green spaces whose maximum speed is
twenty-five miles per hour.
* * *
(5)(a) "Utility terrain vehicle" means any recreational motor vehicle
designed for and capable of travel over designated roads, with a minimum width of
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 503 ENROLLED
fifty inches but not exceeding seventy-four inches and a minimum weight of at least
seven hundred pounds but not exceeding three thousand five hundred pounds.
"Utility terrain vehicle" shall include those vehicles not equipped with a certification
label as required by 49 CFR Part 567.4. A "utility terrain vehicle" or "UTV" also
means a recreational off-highway vehicle or ROV.
(b) "Utility terrain vehicle" does not include golf carts, vehicles specially
designed to carry a disabled person, or vehicles otherwise registered under R.S.
32:299.
B.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
governing authority of Golden Meadow may, in its discretion, by ordinance
authorize the operation of golf carts, utility terrain vehicles, and low-speed vehicles
only on the shoulder of a public road and street, except for Louisiana Highway 3235,
having a speed limit of thirty miles or less per hour. The authorization shall be
contained in an ordinance and recorded in the minutes of the governing authority.
The authorization may be accompanied by conditions not inconsistent with this
Section and may be revoked, in whole, or in part, by the governing authority at any
time.
(2) Any person operating a golf cart, utility terrain vehicle, or low-speed
vehicle on the shoulder of a public road or street in the town pursuant to this Section
shall be properly licensed to operate a vehicle upon any highway within this state and
shall have in his possession proof of insurance as required by Part I-A of Chapter 5
of this Title.
C.(1) Every golf cart, utility terrain vehicle, and low-speed vehicle operated
pursuant to this Section shall be required to be registered with the governing
authority. The owner of the golf cart, utility terrain vehicle, or low-speed vehicle
shall be issued a registration decal by the governing authority that must be displayed
as determined by the governing authority. The registration shall remain valid for as
long as the registering owner owns the golf cart, utility terrain vehicle, or low-speed
vehicle.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 503 ENROLLED
(2) The governing authority may, by ordinance, establish a registration fee
for golf carts, utility terrain vehicles, and low-speed vehicles. The registration fee
shall be retained by the municipal clerk and deposited into the municipal general
fund.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.